Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0904.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6. (1) "Center program" means a program operated by a district or by an intermediate district for special education pupils from several districts in programs for pupils with autism spectrum disorder, pupils with severe cognitive impairment, pupils with moderate cognitive impairment, pupils with severe multiple impairments, pupils with hearing impairment, pupils with visual impairment, and pupils with physical impairment or other health impairment. Programs for pupils with emotional impairment housed in buildings that do not serve regular education pupils also qualify. Unless otherwise approved by the department, a center program either serves all constituent districts within an intermediate district or serves several districts with less than 50% of the pupils residing in the operating district. In addition, special education center program pupils placed part-time in noncenter programs to comply with the least restrictive environment provisions of section 1412 of the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 USC 1412, may be considered center program pupils for pupil accounting purposes for the time scheduled in either a center program or a noncenter program. (2) "District and high school graduation rate" means the annual completion and pupil dropout rate that is calculated by the center pursuant to nationally recognized standards. (3) "District and high school graduation report" means a report of the number of pupils, excluding adult education participants, in the district for the immediately preceding school year, adjusted for those pupils who have transferred into or out of the district or high school, who leave high school with a diploma or other credential of equal status. (4) "Membership", except as otherwise provided in this article, means for a district, a public school academy, or an intermediate district the sum of the product of .90 times the number of full-time equated pupils in grades K to 12 actually enrolled and in regular daily attendance in the district, public school academy, or intermediate district on the pupil membership count day for the current school year, plus the product of .10 times the final audited count from the supplemental count day of full-time equated pupils in grades K to 12 actually enrolled and in regular daily attendance in the district, public school academy, or intermediate district for the immediately preceding school year. A district's, public school academy's, or intermediate district's membership is adjusted as provided under section 25e for pupils who enroll after the pupil membership count day in a strict discipline academy operating under sections 1311b to 1311m of the revised school code, MCL 380.1311b to 380.1311m. All pupil counts used in this subsection are as determined by the department and calculated by adding the number of pupils registered for attendance plus pupils received by transfer and minus pupils lost as defined by rules promulgated by the superintendent, and as corrected by a subsequent department audit. The amount of the foundation allowance for a pupil in membership is determined under section 20. In making the calculation of membership, all of the following, as applicable, apply to determining the membership of a district, a public school academy, or an intermediate district: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, and pursuant to subsection (6), a pupil is counted in membership in the pupil's educating district or districts. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an individual pupil must not be counted for more than a total of 1.0 full-time equated membership. (b) If a pupil is educated in a district other than the pupil's district of residence, if the pupil is not being educated as part of a cooperative education program, if the pupil's district of residence does not give the educating district its approval to count the pupil in membership in the educating district, and if the pupil is not covered by an exception specified in subsection (6) to the requirement that the educating district must have the approval of the pupil's district of residence to count the pupil in membership, the pupil is not counted in membership in any district. (c) A special education pupil educated by the intermediate district is counted in membership in the intermediate district. (d) A pupil placed by a court or state agency in an on-grounds program of a juvenile detention facility, a child caring institution, or a mental health institution, or a pupil funded under section 53a, is counted in membership in the district or intermediate district approved by the department to operate the program. (e) A pupil enrolled in the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind is counted in membership in the pupil's intermediate district of residence. (f) A pupil enrolled in a career and technical education program supported by a millage levied over an area larger than a single district or in an area vocational-technical education program established under section 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.690, is counted in membership only in the pupil's district of residence. (g) A pupil enrolled in a public school academy is counted in membership in the public school academy. (h) For the purposes of this section and section 6a, for a cyber school, as that term is defined in section 551 of the revised school code, MCL 380.551, that is in compliance with section 553a of the revised school code, MCL 380.553a, a pupil's participation in the cyber school's educational program is considered regular daily attendance, and for a district or public school academy, a pupil's participation in a virtual course as that term is defined in section 21f is considered regular daily attendance. Beginning July 1, 2021, this subdivision is subject to section 8c. It is the intent of the legislature that the immediately preceding sentence apply retroactively and is effective July 1, 2021. For the purposes of this subdivision, for a pupil enrolled in a cyber school, all of the following apply with regard to the participation requirement as described in this subdivision: (i) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the pupil shall participate in each scheduled course on pupil membership count day or supplemental count day, as applicable. If the pupil is absent on pupil membership count day or supplemental count day, as applicable, the pupil must attend and participate in class during the next 10 consecutive school days if the absence was unexcused, or during the next 30 calendar days if the absence was excused. (ii) For a pupil who is not learning sequentially, 1 or more of the following must be met on pupil membership count day or supplemental count day, as applicable, for each scheduled course to satisfy the participation requirement under this subdivision: (A) The pupil attended a live lesson from the teacher. (B) The pupil logged into a lesson or lesson activity and the login can be documented. (C) The pupil and teacher engaged in a subject-oriented telephone conversation. (D) There is documentation of an email dialogue between the pupil and teacher. (E) There is documentation of activity or work between the learning coach and pupil. (F) An alternate form of attendance as determined and agreed upon by the cyber school and the pupil membership auditor was met. (iii) For a pupil using sequential learning, the participation requirement under this subdivision is satisfied if either of the following occurs: (A) Except as otherwise provided in this sub-subparagraph, the pupil and the teacher of record or mentor complete a 2-way interaction for 1 course during the week on which pupil membership count day or supplemental count day, as applicable, occurs, and the 3 consecutive weeks following that week. However, if a school break is scheduled during any of the weeks described in this sub-subparagraph that is 4 or more days in length or instruction has been canceled districtwide during any of the weeks described in this sub-subparagraph for 3 or more school days, the district is not required to ensure that the pupil and the teacher of record or mentor completed a 2-way interaction for that week. As used in this sub-subparagraph: (I) "2-way interaction" means the communication that occurs between the teacher of record or mentor and pupil, where 1 party initiates communication and a response from the other party follows that communication. Responses as described in this sub-sub-subparagraph must be to the communication initiated by the teacher of record or mentor, and not some other action taken. This interaction may occur through, but is not limited to, means such as email, telephone, instant messaging, or face-to-face conversation. A parent- or legal-guardian-facilitated 2-way interaction is considered a 2-way interaction if the pupil is in any of grades K to 5 and does not yet possess the skills necessary to participate in 2-way interactions unassisted. The interactions described in this sub-sub-subparagraph must relate to a virtual course on the pupil's schedule and pertain to course content or progress. (II) "Mentor" means a professional employee of the district who monitors the pupil's progress, ensures the pupil has access to needed technology, is available for assistance, and ensures access to the teacher of record. A mentor may also be the teacher of record if the mentor meets the definition of a teacher of record under this sub-subparagraph and the district is the provider for the course. (III) "Teacher of record" means a teacher to whom all of the following apply: (1) The teacher is responsible for providing instruction, determining instructional methods for each pupil, diagnosing learning needs, assessing pupil learning, prescribing intervention strategies and modifying lessons, reporting outcomes, and evaluating the effects of instruction and support strategies. The teacher of record may coordinate the distribution and assignment of the responsibilities described in this sub-sub-sub-subparagraph with other teachers participating in the instructional process for a course. (2) The teacher is certified for the grade level or is working under a valid substitute permit, authorization, or approval issued by the department. (3) The teacher has a personnel identification code provided by the center. (IV) "Week" means a period that starts on Wednesday and ends the following Tuesday. (B) The pupil completes a combination of 1 or more of the following activities for each scheduled course on pupil membership count day or supplemental count day, as applicable: (I) Documented attendance in a virtual course where synchronous, live instruction occurred with the teacher. (II) Documented completion of a course assignment. (III) Documented completion of a course lesson or lesson activity. (IV) Documented pupil access to an ongoing lesson, which does not include a login. (V) Documented physical attendance on pupil membership count day or supplemental count day, as applicable, in each scheduled course, if the pupil will attend at least 50% of the instructional time for each scheduled course on-site, face-to-face with the teacher of record. As used in this sub-sub-subparagraph, "teacher of record" means that term as defined in subparagraph (iii)(A). (iv) For purposes of subparagraph (iii), each scheduled course currently being attempted by the pupil, rather than every course on the pupil's schedule for the entire term, is considered a part of each scheduled course for the pupil. (i) For a new district or public school academy beginning its operation after December 31, 1994, membership for the first 2 full or partial fiscal years of operation is determined as follows: (i) If operations begin before the pupil membership count day for the fiscal year, membership is the average number of full-time equated pupils in grades K to 12 actually enrolled and in regular daily attendance on the pupil membership count day for the current school year and on the supplemental count day for the current school year, as determined by the department and calculated by adding the number of pupils registered for attendance on the pupil membership count day plus pupils received by transfer and minus pupils lost as defined by rules promulgated by the superintendent, and as corrected by a subsequent department audit, plus the final audited count from the supplemental count day for the current school year, and dividing that sum by 2. (ii) If operations begin after the pupil membership count day for the fiscal year and not later than the supplemental count day for the fiscal year, membership is the final audited count of the number of full-time equated pupils in grades K to 12 actually enrolled and in regular daily attendance on the supplemental count day for the current school year. (j) If a district is the authorizing body for a public school academy, then, in the first school year in which pupils are counted in membership on the pupil membership count day in the public school academy, the determination of the district's membership excludes from the district's pupil count for the immediately preceding supplemental count day any pupils who are counted in the public school academy on that first pupil membership count day who were also counted in the district on the immediately preceding supplemental count day. (k) For an extended school year program approved by the superintendent, a pupil enrolled, but not scheduled to be in regular daily attendance, on a pupil membership count day, is counted in membership. (l) To be counted in membership, a pupil must meet the minimum age requirement to be eligible to attend school under section 1147 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1147, and must be less than 20 years of age on September 1 of the school year except as follows: (i) A special education pupil who is enrolled and receiving instruction in a special education program or service approved by the department, who does not have a high school diploma, and who is less than 26 years of age as of September 1 of the current school year is counted in membership. (ii) A pupil who is determined by the department to meet all of the following may be counted in membership: (A) Is enrolled in a public school academy or an alternative education high school diploma program, that is primarily focused on educating pupils with extreme barriers to education, such as being homeless as that term is defined under 42 USC 11302. (B) Had dropped out of school. (C) Is less than 22 years of age as of September 1 of the current school year. (iii) If a child does not meet the minimum age requirement to be eligible to attend school for that school year under section 1147 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1147, but will be 5 years of age not later than December 1 of that school year, the district may count the child in membership for that school year if the parent or legal guardian has notified the district in writing that the parent or legal guardian intends to enroll the child in kindergarten for that school year. (m) An individual who has achieved a high school diploma is not counted in membership. An individual who has achieved a high school equivalency certificate is not counted in membership unless the individual is a student with a disability as that term is defined in R 340.1702 of the Michigan Administrative Code. An individual participating in a job training program funded under former section 107a or a jobs program funded under former section 107b, administered by the department of labor and economic opportunity, or participating in any successor of either of those 2 programs, is not counted in membership. (n) If a pupil counted in membership in a public school academy is also educated by a district or intermediate district as part of a cooperative education program, the pupil is counted in membership only in the public school academy unless a written agreement signed by all parties designates the party or parties in which the pupil is counted in membership, and the instructional time scheduled for the pupil in the district or intermediate district is included in the full-time equated membership determination under subdivision (q) and section 101. However, for pupils receiving instruction in both a public school academy and in a district or intermediate district but not as a part of a cooperative education program, the following apply: (i) If the public school academy provides instruction for at least 1/2 of the class hours required under section 101, the public school academy receives as its prorated share of the full-time equated membership for each of those pupils an amount equal to 1 times the product of the hours of instruction the public school academy provides divided by the number of hours required under section 101 for full-time equivalency, and the remainder of the full-time membership for each of those pupils is allocated to the district or intermediate district providing the remainder of the hours of instruction. (ii) If the public school academy provides instruction for less than 1/2 of the class hours required under section 101, the district or intermediate district providing the remainder of the hours of instruction receives as its prorated share of the full-time equated membership for each of those pupils an amount equal to 1 times the product of the hours of instruction the district or intermediate district provides divided by the number of hours required under section 101 for full-time equivalency, and the remainder of the full-time membership for each of those pupils is allocated to the public school academy. (o) An individual less than 16 years of age as of September 1 of the current school year who is being educated in an alternative education program is not counted in membership if there are also adult education participants being educated in the same program or classroom. (p) The department shall give a uniform interpretation of full-time and part-time memberships. (q) The number of class hours used to calculate full-time equated memberships must be consistent with section 101. In determining full-time equated memberships for pupils who are enrolled in a postsecondary institution or for pupils engaged in an internship or work experience under section 1279h of the revised school code, MCL 380.1279h, a pupil is not considered to be less than a full-time equated pupil solely because of the effect of the pupil's postsecondary enrollment or engagement in the internship or work experience, including necessary travel time, on the number of class hours provided by the district to the pupil. (r) Full-time equated memberships for pupils in kindergarten are determined by dividing the number of instructional hours scheduled and provided per year per kindergarten pupil by the same number used for determining full-time equated memberships for pupils in grades 1 to 12. However, to the extent allowable under federal law, for a district or public school academy that provides evidence satisfactory to the department that it used federal title I money in the 2 immediately preceding school fiscal years to fund full-time kindergarten, full-time equated memberships for pupils in kindergarten are determined by dividing the number of class hours scheduled and provided per year per kindergarten pupil by a number equal to 1/2 the number used for determining full-time equated memberships for pupils in grades 1 to 12. The change in the counting of full-time equated memberships for pupils in kindergarten that took effect for 2012-2013 is not a mandate. (s) For a district or a public school academy that has pupils enrolled in a grade level that was not offered by the district or public school academy in the immediately preceding school year, the number of pupils enrolled in that grade level to be counted in membership is the average of the number of those pupils enrolled and in regular daily attendance on the pupil membership count day and the supplemental count day of the current school year. Membership is calculated by adding the number of pupils registered for attendance in that grade level on the pupil membership count day plus pupils received by transfer and minus pupils lost as defined by rules promulgated by the superintendent, and as corrected by subsequent department audit, plus the final audited count from the supplemental count day for the current school year, and dividing that sum by 2. (t) A pupil enrolled in a cooperative education program may be counted in membership in the pupil's district of residence with the written approval of all parties to the cooperative agreement. (u) If, as a result of a disciplinary action, a district determines through the district's alternative or disciplinary education program that the best instructional placement for a pupil is in the pupil's home or otherwise apart from the general school population, if that placement is authorized in writing by the district superintendent and district alternative or disciplinary education supervisor, and if the district provides appropriate instruction as described in this subdivision to the pupil at the pupil's home or otherwise apart from the general school population, the district may count the pupil in membership on a pro rata basis, with the proration based on the number of hours of instruction the district actually provides to the pupil divided by the number of hours required under section 101 for full-time equivalency. For the purposes of this subdivision, a district is considered to be providing appropriate instruction if all of the following are met: (i) The district provides at least 2 nonconsecutive hours of instruction per week to the pupil at the pupil's home or otherwise apart from the general school population under the supervision of a certificated teacher. (ii) The district provides instructional materials, resources, and supplies that are comparable to those otherwise provided in the district's alternative education program. (iii) Course content is comparable to that in the district's alternative education program. (iv) Credit earned is awarded to the pupil and placed on the pupil's transcript. (v) If a pupil was enrolled in a public school academy on the pupil membership count day, if the public school academy's contract with its authorizing body is revoked or the public school academy otherwise ceases to operate, and if the pupil enrolls in a district within 45 days after the pupil membership count day, the department shall adjust the district's pupil count for the pupil membership count day to include the pupil in the count. (w) For a public school academy that has been in operation for at least 2 years and that suspended operations for at least 1 semester and is resuming operations, membership is the sum of the product of .90 times the number of full-time equated pupils in grades K to 12 actually enrolled and in regular daily attendance on the first pupil membership count day or supplemental count day, whichever is first, occurring after operations resume, plus the product of .10 times the final audited count from the most recent pupil membership count day or supplemental count day that occurred before suspending operations, as determined by the superintendent. (x) If a district's membership for a particular fiscal year, as otherwise calculated under this subsection, would be less than 1,550 pupils, the district has 4.5 or fewer pupils per square mile, as determined by the department, and the district does not receive funding under section 22d(2), the district's membership is considered to be the membership figure calculated under this subdivision. If a district educates and counts in its membership pupils in grades 9 to 12 who reside in a contiguous district that does not operate grades 9 to 12 and if 1 or both of the affected districts request the department to use the determination allowed under this sentence, the department shall include the square mileage of both districts in determining the number of pupils per square mile for each of the districts for the purposes of this subdivision. If a district has established a community engagement advisory committee in partnership with the department of treasury, is required to submit a deficit elimination plan or an enhanced deficit elimination plan under section 1220 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1220, and is located in a city with a population between 9,000 and 11,000, as determined by the department, that is in a county with a population between 150,000 and 160,000, as determined by the department, the district's membership is considered to be the membership figure calculated under this subdivision. The membership figure calculated under this subdivision is the greater of the following: (i) The average of the district's membership for the 3-fiscal-year period ending with that fiscal year, calculated by adding the district's actual membership for each of those 3 fiscal years, as otherwise calculated under this subsection, and dividing the sum of those 3 membership figures by 3. (ii) The district's actual membership for that fiscal year as otherwise calculated under this subsection. (y) Full-time equated memberships for special education pupils who are not enrolled in kindergarten but are enrolled in a classroom program under R 340.1754 of the Michigan Administrative Code are determined by dividing the number of class hours scheduled and provided per year by 450. Full-time equated memberships for special education pupils who are not enrolled in kindergarten but are receiving early childhood special education services under R 340.1755 or R 340.1862 of the Michigan Administrative Code are determined by dividing the number of hours of service scheduled and provided per year per pupil by 180. (z) A pupil of a district that begins its school year after Labor Day who is enrolled in an intermediate district program that begins before Labor Day is not considered to be less than a full-time pupil solely due to instructional time scheduled but not attended by the pupil before Labor Day. (aa) For the first year in which a pupil is counted in membership on the pupil membership count day in a middle college program, the membership is the average of the full-time equated membership on the pupil membership count day and on the supplemental count day for the current school year, as determined by the department. If a pupil described in this subdivision was counted in membership by the operating district on the immediately preceding supplemental count day, the pupil is excluded from the district's immediately preceding supplemental count for the purposes of determining the district's membership. (bb) A district or public school academy that educates a pupil who attends a United States Olympic Education Center may count the pupil in membership regardless of whether or not the pupil is a resident of this state. (cc) A pupil enrolled in a district other than the pupil's district of residence under section 1148(2) of the revised school code, MCL 380.1148, is counted in the educating district. (dd) For a pupil enrolled in a dropout recovery program that meets the requirements of section 23a, the pupil is counted as 1/12 of a full-time equated membership for each month that the district operating the program reports that the pupil was enrolled in the program and was in full attendance or based on the number of successfully completed courses by the pupil with each course equivalent to 1/12 of a full-time equated membership. A district may claim more than 1/12 of a full-time equated membership within a month for an enrolled pupil who was in full attendance and successfully completed more than 1 required course. However, if the special membership counting provisions under this subdivision and the operation of the other membership counting provisions under this subsection result in a pupil being counted as more than 1.0 FTE in a fiscal year, the payment made for the pupil under sections 22a and 22b must not be based on more than 1.0 FTE for that pupil, and any portion of an FTE for that pupil that exceeds 1.0 is instead paid under section 25g. The district operating the program shall report to the center the number of pupils who were enrolled in the program and were in full attendance for a month not later than 30 days after the end of the month. A district shall not report a pupil as being in full attendance for a month unless both of the following are met: (i) A personalized learning plan is in place on or before the first school day of the month for the first month the pupil participates in the program. (ii) Either of the following is met: (A) The pupil meets the district's definition under section 23a of satisfactory monthly progress for that month or, if the pupil does not meet that definition of satisfactory monthly progress for that month, the pupil did meet that definition of satisfactory monthly progress in the immediately preceding month and appropriate interventions, as defined by the district, are implemented within 10 school days after it is determined that the pupil does not meet that definition of satisfactory monthly progress. (B) For the first 2 months that the pupil participates in the program, the pupil earns 0.25 credit by the end of the second month. A pupil described in this sub-subparagraph may be retroactively reported as being in full attendance for the first month that the pupil participated in the program. (ee) A pupil participating in a virtual course under section 21f is counted in membership in the district enrolling the pupil. (ff) If a public school academy that is not in its first or second year of operation closes at the end of a school year and does not reopen for the next school year, the department shall adjust the membership count of the district or other public school academy in which a former pupil of the closed public school academy enrolls and is in regular daily attendance for the next school year to ensure that the district or other public school academy receives the same amount of membership aid for the pupil as if the pupil were counted in the district or other public school academy on the supplemental count day of the preceding school year. (gg) If a special education pupil is expelled under section 1311 or 1311a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1311 and 380.1311a, and is not in attendance on the pupil membership count day because of the expulsion, and if the pupil remains enrolled in the district and resumes regular daily attendance during that school year, the district's membership is adjusted to count the pupil in membership as if the pupil had been in attendance on the pupil membership count day. (hh) A pupil enrolled in a community district is counted in membership in the community district. (ii) A part-time pupil enrolled in a nonpublic school in grades K to 12 in accordance with section 166b must not be counted as more than 0.75 of a full-time equated membership. (jj) A district that borders another state or a public school academy that operates at least grades 9 to 12 and is located within 20 miles of a border with another state may count in membership a pupil who is enrolled in a course at a college or university that is located in the bordering state and within 20 miles of the border with this state if all of the following are met: (i) The pupil would meet the definition of an eligible student under the postsecondary enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511 to 388.524, if the course were an eligible course under that act. (ii) The course in which the pupil is enrolled would meet the definition of an eligible course under the postsecondary enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511 to 388.524, if the course were provided by an eligible postsecondary institution under that act. (iii) The department determines that the college or university is an institution that, in the other state, fulfills a function comparable to a state university or community college, as those terms are defined in section 3 of the postsecondary enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.513, or is an independent nonprofit degree-granting college or university. (iv) The district or public school academy pays for a portion of the pupil's tuition at the college or university in an amount equal to the eligible charges that the district or public school academy would pay to an eligible postsecondary institution under the postsecondary enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511 to 388.524, as if the course were an eligible course under that act. (v) The district or public school academy awards high school credit to a pupil who successfully completes a course as described in this subdivision. (kk) A pupil enrolled in a middle college program may be counted for more than a total of 1.0 full-time equated membership for any of the school years in which the pupil is enrolled in the middle college program, but the total full-time equated membership for that pupil for all of the school years in which the pupil is enrolled in high school must not be greater than 5.00 full-time equated membership if the pupil is enrolled in more than the minimum number of instructional days and hours required under section 101 and the pupil is expected to complete the 5-year program with both a high school diploma and at least 60 transferable college credits or is expected to earn an associate's degree in fewer than 5 years. A pupil who graduates with both a high school diploma and at least 60 transferable college credits or an associate degree at least 1 semester early is considered to have completed the middle college program in fewer than 5 years. (ll) If a district's or public school academy's membership for a particular fiscal year, as otherwise calculated under this subsection, includes pupils counted in membership who are enrolled under section 166b, all of the following apply for the purposes of this subdivision: (i) If the district's or public school academy's membership for pupils counted under section 166b equals or exceeds 5% of the district's or public school academy's membership for pupils not counted in membership under section 166b in the immediately preceding fiscal year, then the growth in the district's or public school academy's membership for pupils counted under section 166b must not exceed 10%. (ii) If the district's or public school academy's membership for pupils counted under section 166b is less than 5% of the district's or public school academy's membership for pupils not counted in membership under section 166b in the immediately preceding fiscal year, then the district's or public school academy's membership for pupils counted under section 166b must not exceed the greater of the following: (A) Five percent of the district's or public school academy's membership for pupils not counted in membership under section 166b. (B) Ten percent more than the district's or public school academy's membership for pupils counted under section 166b in the immediately preceding fiscal year. (iii) If 1 or more districts consolidate or are parties to an annexation, then the calculations under subparagraphs (i) and (ii) must be applied to the combined total membership for pupils counted in those districts for the fiscal year immediately preceding the consolidation or annexation. (5) "Public school academy" means that term as defined in section 5 of the revised school code, MCL 380.5. (6) "Pupil" means an individual in membership in a public school. A district must have the approval of the pupil's district of residence to count the pupil in membership, except approval by the pupil's district of residence is not required for any of the following: (a) A nonpublic part-time pupil enrolled in grades K to 12 in accordance with section 166b. (b) A pupil receiving 1/2 or less of the pupil's instruction in a district other than the pupil's district of residence. (c) A pupil enrolled in a public school academy. (d) A pupil enrolled in a district other than the pupil's district of residence if the pupil is enrolled in accordance with section 105 or 105c. (e) A pupil who has made an official written complaint or whose parent or legal guardian has made an official written complaint to law enforcement officials and to school officials of the pupil's district of residence that the pupil has been the victim of a criminal sexual assault or other serious assault, if the official complaint either indicates that the assault occurred at school or that the assault was committed by 1 or more other pupils enrolled in the school the pupil would otherwise attend in the district of residence or by an employee of the district of residence. A person who intentionally makes a false report of a crime to law enforcement officials for the purposes of this subdivision is subject to section 411a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.411a, which provides criminal penalties for that conduct. As used in this subdivision: (i) "At school" means in a classroom, elsewhere on school premises, on a school bus or other school-related vehicle, or at a school-sponsored activity or event whether or not it is held on school premises. (ii) "Serious assault" means an act that constitutes a felony violation of chapter XI of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.81 to 750.90h, or that constitutes an assault and infliction of serious or aggravated injury under section 81a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.81a. (f) A pupil whose district of residence changed after the pupil membership count day and before the supplemental count day and who continues to be enrolled on the supplemental count day as a nonresident in the district in which the pupil was enrolled as a resident on the pupil membership count day of the same school year. (g) A pupil enrolled in an alternative education program operated by a district other than the pupil's district of residence who meets 1 or more of the following: (i) The pupil has been suspended or expelled from the pupil's district of residence for any reason, including, but not limited to, a suspension or expulsion under section 1310, 1311, or 1311a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1310, 380.1311, and 380.1311a. (ii) The pupil had previously dropped out of school. (iii) The pupil is pregnant or is a parent. (iv) The pupil has been referred to the program by a court. (h) A pupil enrolled in the Michigan Virtual School, for the pupil's enrollment in the Michigan Virtual School. (i) A pupil who is the child of a person who works at the district or who is the child of a person who worked at the district as of the time the pupil first enrolled in the district but who no longer works at the district due to a workforce reduction. As used in this subdivision, "child" includes an adopted child, stepchild, or legal ward. (j) An expelled pupil who has been denied reinstatement by the expelling district and is reinstated by another school board under section 1311 or 1311a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1311 and 380.1311a. (k) A pupil enrolled in a district other than the pupil's district of residence in a middle college program if the pupil's district of residence and the enrolling district are both constituent districts of the same intermediate district. (l) A pupil enrolled in a district other than the pupil's district of residence who attends a United States Olympic Education Center. (m) A pupil enrolled in a district other than the pupil's district of residence under section 1148(2) of the revised school code, MCL 380.1148. (n) A pupil who enrolls in a district other than the pupil's district of residence as a result of the pupil's school not making adequate yearly progress under the no child left behind act of 2001, Public Law 107-110, or the every student succeeds act, Public Law 114-95. However, if a district educates pupils who reside in another district and if the primary instructional site for those pupils is established by the educating district after 2009-2010 and is located within the boundaries of that other district, the educating district must have the approval of that other district to count those pupils in membership. (7) "Pupil membership count day" of a district or intermediate district means: (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) or (c), either of the following: (i) The first Wednesday in October each school year. (ii) For a district or building in which school is not in session on the Wednesday described in subparagraph (i) due to conditions not within the control of school authorities, with the approval of the superintendent, the immediately following day on which school is in session in the district or building. (b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), for a district or intermediate district maintaining school during the entire school year, the following days: (i) Fourth Wednesday in July. (ii) First Wednesday in October. (iii) Second Wednesday in February. (iv) Fourth Wednesday in April. (c) If a date listed in subdivision (a) or (b) is on a day of religious or cultural significance, as determined by the district or intermediate district, the immediately following day on which school is in session in the district or building. (8) "Pupils in grades K to 12 actually enrolled and in regular daily attendance" means, except as otherwise provided in this section, pupils in grades K to 12 in attendance and receiving instruction in all classes for which they are enrolled on the pupil membership count day or the supplemental count day, as applicable. Except as otherwise provided in this section and subsection, a pupil who is absent from any of the classes in which the pupil is enrolled on the pupil membership count day or supplemental count day and who does not attend each of those classes during the 10 consecutive school days immediately following the pupil membership count day or supplemental count day, except for a pupil who has been excused by the district, is not counted as 1.0 full-time equated membership. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a pupil who is excused from attendance on the pupil membership count day or supplemental count day and who fails to attend each of the classes in which the pupil is enrolled within 30 calendar days after the pupil membership count day or supplemental count day is not counted as 1.0 full-time equated membership. Except as otherwise provided in this section, in addition, a pupil who was enrolled and in attendance in a district, intermediate district, or public school academy before the pupil membership count day or supplemental count day of a particular year but was expelled or suspended on the pupil membership count day or supplemental count day is only counted as 1.0 full-time equated membership if the pupil resumed attendance in the district, intermediate district, or public school academy within 45 days after the pupil membership count day or supplemental count day of that particular year. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a pupil not counted as 1.0 full-time equated membership due to an absence from a class is counted as a prorated membership for the classes the pupil attended. For purposes of this subsection: (a) "Appropriately placed" means holding a valid Michigan educator credential with the required grade range and discipline or subject area for the assignment, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction. (b) "Class" means either of the following, as applicable: (i) A period of time in 1 day when pupils and an individual who is appropriately placed under a valid certificate, substitute permit, authorization, or approval issued by the department, are together and instruction is taking place. This subdivision does not apply for the 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 school years. (ii) For the 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 school years only, a period of time in 1 day when pupils and a certificated teacher, a teacher engaged to teach under section 1233b of the revised school code, MCL 380.1233b, or an individual working under a valid substitute permit, authorization, or approval issued by the department are together and instruction is taking place. (9) "Rule" means a rule promulgated pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (10) "The revised school code" means the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1 to 380.1852. (11) "School district of the first class", "first class school district", and "district of the first class" mean, for the purposes of this article only, a district that had at least 40,000 pupils in membership for the immediately preceding fiscal year. (12) "School fiscal year" means a fiscal year that commences July 1 and continues through June 30. (13) "State board" means the state board of education. (14) "Superintendent", unless the context clearly refers to a district or intermediate district superintendent, means the superintendent of public instruction described in section 3 of article VIII of the state constitution of 1963. (15) "Supplemental count day" means the day on which the supplemental pupil count is conducted under section 6a. (16) "Tuition pupil" means a pupil of school age attending school in a district other than the pupil's district of residence for whom tuition may be charged to the district of residence. Tuition pupil does not include a pupil who is a special education pupil, a pupil described in subsection (6)(d) to (n), or a pupil whose parent or guardian voluntarily enrolls the pupil in a district that is not the pupil's district of residence. A pupil's district of residence shall not require a high school tuition pupil, as provided under section 111, to attend another school district after the pupil has been assigned to a school district. (17) "State school aid fund" means the state school aid fund established in section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. (18) "Taxable value" means, except as otherwise provided in this article, the taxable value of property as determined under section 27a of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.27a. (19) "Textbook" means a book, electronic book, or other instructional print or electronic resource that is selected and approved by the governing board of a district and that contains a presentation of principles of a subject, or that is a literary work relevant to the study of a subject required for the use of classroom pupils, or another type of course material that forms the basis of classroom instruction. (20) "Total state aid" or "total state school aid", except as otherwise provided in this article, means the total combined amount of all funds due to a district, intermediate district, or other entity under this article. (21) "Weighted pupil membership" means that term as calculated in this subsection. For the purposes of calculations under this subsection, the base weighted pupil membership for a district is 0. All of the following apply to the weighted pupil membership under this subsection: (a) For each full-time English language learner counted in membership in a district in the immediately preceding fiscal year, the weighted pupil membership for that district must be increased as follows: (i) For a full-time equivalent English language learner who was assessed in the immediately preceding fiscal year under the WIDA ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate ACCESS with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score between 1.0 and 1.9, as applicable to each assessment, an increase of 0.1687. The increase under this subparagraph must be adjusted annually as follows until the increase equals 0.75: (A) For 2027-2028, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.2063. (B) For 2028-2029, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.2475. (C) For 2029-2030, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.2888. (D) For 2030-2031, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.3300. (E) For 2031-2032, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.3713. (F) For 2032-2033, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.4125. (G) For 2033-2034, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.4538. (H) For 2034-2035, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.4950. (I) For 2035-2036, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.5363. (J) For 2036-2037, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.5775. (K) For 2037-2038, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.6188 (L) For 2038-2039, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.6600. (M) For 2039-2040, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.7013. (N) Beginning in 2040-2041 and every fiscal year thereafter, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.75. (ii) For a full-time equivalent English language learner who was assessed in the immediately preceding fiscal year under the WIDA ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate ACCESS with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score between 2.0 and 2.9, as applicable to each assessment, an increase of 0.1165. The increase under this subparagraph must be adjusted annually as follows until the increase equals 0.50: (A) For 2027-2028, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.1425. (B) For 2028-2029, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.1700. (C) For 2029-2030, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.1975. (D) For 2030-2031, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.2250. (E) For 2031-2032, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.2525. (F) For 2032-2033, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.2800. (G) For 2033-2034, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.3075. (H) For 2034-2035, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.3350. (I) For 2035-2036, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.3625. (J) For 2036-2037, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.3900. (K) For 2037-2038, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.4175. (L) For 2038-2039, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.4450. (M) For 2039-2040, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.4725. (N) Beginning in 2040-2041 and every fiscal year thereafter, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.50. (iii) For a full-time equivalent English language learner who was assessed in the immediately preceding fiscal year under the WIDA ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate ACCESS with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score between 3.0 and 3.9, as applicable to each assessment, an increase of 0.0190. The increase under this subparagraph must be adjusted annually as follows until the increase equals 0.35: (A) For 2027-2028, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.0429. (B) For 2028-2029, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.0665. (C) For 2029-2030, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.0901. (D) For 2030-2031, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.1138. (E) For 2031-2032, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.1374. (F) For 2032-2033, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.1610. (G) For 2033-2034, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.1846. (H) For 2034-2035, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.2083. (I) For 2035-2036, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.2319. (J) For 2036-2037, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.2555. (K) For 2037-2038, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.2791. (L) For 2038-2039, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.3028. (M) For 2039-2040, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.3264. (N) Beginning in 2040-2041 and every fiscal year thereafter, the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be increased to 0.35. (b) For each economically disadvantaged pupil counted in membership in a district, the weighted pupil membership for that district must be increased as follows: (i) For the purpose of this subparagraph, the department shall determine the number of pupils in membership who are economically disadvantaged as the greatest of the following: (A) The number of membership pupils in the district who are determined to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the center in the form and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day of the immediately preceding fiscal year. (B) If the district is in the community eligibility program, the number of pupils determined to be eligible based on the product of the identified student percentage multiplied by the total number of pupils in the district, as reported to the center in the form and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day of the immediately preceding fiscal year. These calculations must be made at the building level. This sub-subparagraph applies only to an eligible district for the fiscal year immediately following the first fiscal year in which it is in the community eligibility program. As used in this sub-subparagraph, "identified student percentage" means the quotient of the number of pupils in an eligible district who are determined to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the center in a form and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day in the fiscal year preceding the first fiscal year in which the eligible district is in the community eligibility program, divided by the total number of pupils counted in an eligible district on the pupil membership count day in the fiscal year preceding the first fiscal year in which the eligible district is in the community eligibility program. (C) If the district began operations as a district after the pupil membership count day of the current fiscal year, the number of membership pupils in the district who are determined to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the center in the form and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth Wednesday after the supplemental count day of the current fiscal year. (D) If, for a particular fiscal year, the number of membership pupils in a district who are determined under sub-subparagraph (A) to be economically disadvantaged or to be eligible based on the identified student percentage varies by more than 20 percentage points from the number of those pupils in the district as calculated under sub-subparagraph (A) for the immediately preceding fiscal year caused by an egregious reporting error by the district, the department may choose to have the calculations under sub-subparagraph (A) instead be made using the number of membership pupils in the district who are determined to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the center in the form and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth Wednesday after the supplemental count day of the immediately preceding fiscal year. As used in this sub-subparagraph, "identified student percentage" means that term as defined in sub-subparagraph (B). (ii) Each district or public school academy must be assigned an opportunity index score each fiscal year, the value of which is the quotient of the number of economically disadvantaged pupils as determined under this subdivision for the district or public school academy and the total number of pupils in the district or public school academy in the immediately preceding fiscal year, multiplied by 100 and rounded up to the nearest whole number. Each district or public school academy must be assigned an opportunity index band as follows: (A) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 0 but less than 20 must be assigned to band 1 and shall receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.1692 and not more than 0.1741 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph must be an amount equal to the district's opportunity index score minus 1, multiplied by the band adjustment factor applicable to this subdivision, plus 0.1692 multiplied by the number of pupils identified as economically disadvantaged under this sub-subparagraph. The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph must be increased as follows until it reaches between .35 and .36 per economically disadvantaged pupil: (I) For 2027-2028, a district assigned to band 1 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.1811 and not more than 0.1863 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (II) For 2028-2029, a district assigned to band 1 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.1943 and not more than 0.1998 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (III) For 2029-2030, a district assigned to band 1 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2074 and not more than 0.2133 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (IV) For 2030-2031, a district assigned to band 1 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2205 and not more than 0.2268 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (V) For 2031-2032, a district assigned to band 1 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2336 and not more than 0.2403 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VI) For 2032-2033, a district assigned to band 1 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2468 and not more than 0.2538 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VII) For 2033-2034, a district assigned to band 1 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2599 and not more than 0.2673 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VIII) For 2034-2035, a district assigned to band 1 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2730 and not more than 0.2808 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (IX) For 2035-2036, a district assigned to band 1 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2861 and not more than 0.2943 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (X) For 2036-2037, a district assigned to band 1 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2993 and not more than 0.3078 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XI) For 2037-2038, a district assigned to band 1 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3124 and not more than 0.3213 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XII) For 2038-2039, a district assigned to band 1 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3255 and not more than 0.3348 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XIII) For 2039-2040, a district assigned to band 1 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3386 and not more than 0.3483 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XIV) For 2040-2041, and every fiscal year thereafter, a district assigned to band 1 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.35 and not more than 0.36 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (B) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 20 but less than 44 must be assigned to band 2 and shall receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.1741 and not more than 0.1813 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph must be an amount equal to the district's opportunity index score minus 20, multiplied by the band adjustment factor applicable to this subdivision, plus 0.1741 multiplied by the number of pupils identified as economically disadvantaged under this sub-subparagraph. The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph must be increased as follows until it reaches between 0.36 and 0.375 per economically disadvantaged pupil: (I) For 2027-2028, a district assigned to band 2 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.1863 and not more than 0.1941 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (II) For 2028-2029, a district assigned to band 2 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.1998 and not more than 0.2081 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (III) For 2029-2030, a district assigned to band 2 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2133 and not more than 0.2222 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (IV) For 2030-2031, a district assigned to band 2 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2268 and not more than 0.2363 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (V) For 2031-2032, a district assigned to band 2 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2403 and not more than 0.2503 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VI) For 2032-2033, a district assigned to band 2 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2538 and not more than 0.2644 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VII) For 2033-2034, a district assigned to band 2 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2673 and not more than 0.2784 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VIII) For 2034-2035, a district assigned to band 2 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2808 and not more than 0.2925 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (IX) For 2035-2036, a district assigned to band 2 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2943 and not more than 0.3066 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (X) For 2036-2037, a district assigned to band 2 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3078 and not more than 0.3206 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XI) For 2037-2038, a district assigned to band 2 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3213 and not more than 0.3347 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XII) For 2038-2039, a district assigned to band 2 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3348 and not more than 0.3488 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XIII) For 2039-2040, a district assigned to band 2 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3483 and not more than 0.3628 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XIV) For 2040-2041, and every fiscal year thereafter, a district assigned to band 2 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.36 and not more than 0.375 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (C) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 44 but less than 59 must be assigned to band 3 and shall receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.1813 and not more than 0.1886 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph must be an amount equal to the district's opportunity index score minus 44, multiplied by the band adjustment factor applicable to this subdivision, plus 0.1813 multiplied by the number of pupils identified as economically disadvantaged under this sub-subparagraph. The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph must be increased as follows until it reaches between 0.375 and 0.39 per economically disadvantaged pupil: (I) For 2027-2028, a district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.1941 and not more than 0.2018 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (II) For 2028-2029, a district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2081 and not more than 0.2165 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (III) For 2029-2030, a district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2222 and not more than 0.2311 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (IV) For 2030-2031, a district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2363 and not more than 0.2457 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (V) For 2031-2032, a district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2503 and not more than 0.2603 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VI) For 2032-2033, a district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2644 and not more than 0.2750 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VII) For 2033-2034, a district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2784 and not more than 0.2896 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VIII) For 2034-2035, a district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2925 and not more than 0.3042 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (IX) For 2035-2036, a district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3066 and not more than 0.3188 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (X) For 2036-2037, a district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3206 and not more than 0.3335 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XI) For 2037-2038, a district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3347 and not more than 0.3481 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XII) For 2038-2039, a district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3488 and not more than 0.3627 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XIII) For 2039-2040, a district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3628 and not more than 0.3773 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XIV) For 2040-2041, and every fiscal year thereafter, a district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.375 and not more than 0.39 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (D) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 59 but less than 73 must be assigned to band 4 and shall receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.1886 and not more than 0.2031 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph must be an amount equal to the district's opportunity index score minus 59, multiplied by the band adjustment factor applicable to this sub-subparagraph, plus 0.1886 multiplied by the number of pupils identified as economically disadvantaged under this sub-subparagraph. The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph must be increased as follows until it reaches between 0.39 and 0.42 per economically disadvantaged pupil: (I) For 2027-2028, a district assigned to band 4 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2018 and not more than 0.2174 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (II) For 2028-2029, a district assigned to band 4 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2165 and not more than 0.2331 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (III) For 2029-2030, a district assigned to band 4 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2311 and not more than 0.2489 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (IV) For 2030-2031, a district assigned to band 4 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2457 and not more than 0.2646 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (V) For 2031-2032, a district assigned to band 4 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2603 and not more than 0.2804 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VI) For 2032-2033, a district assigned to band 4 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2750 and not more than 0.2961 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VII) For 2033-2034, a district assigned to band 4 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2896 and not more than 0.3119 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VIII) For 2034-2035, a district assigned to band 4 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3042 and not more than 0.3276 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (IX) For 2035-2036, a district assigned to band 4 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3188 and not more than 0.3434 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (X) For 2036-2037, a district assigned to band 4 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3335 and not more than 0.3591 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XI) For 2037-2038, a district assigned to band 4 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3481 and not more than 0.3749 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XII) For 2038-2039, a district assigned to band 4 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3627 and not more than 0.3906 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XIII) For 2039-2040, a district assigned to band 4 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3773 and not more than 0.4064 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XIV) For 2040-2041, and every fiscal year thereafter, a district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.39 and not more than 0.42 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (E) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 73 but less than 85 must be assigned to band 5 and shall receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2031 and not more than 0.2273 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph must be an amount equal to the district's opportunity index score minus 73, multiplied by the band adjustment factor applicable to this sub-subparagraph, plus 0.2031 multiplied by the number of pupils identified as economically disadvantaged under this sub-subparagraph. The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph must be increased as follows until it reaches between 0.42 and 0.47 per economically disadvantaged pupil: (I) For 2027-2028, a district assigned to band 5 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2174 and not more than 0.2432 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (II) For 2028-2029, a district assigned to band 5 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2331 and not more than 0.2609 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (III) For 2029-2030, a district assigned to band 5 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2489 and not more than 0.2785 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (IV) For 2030-2031, a district assigned to band 5 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2646 and not more than 0.2961 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (V) For 2031-2032, a district assigned to band 5 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2804 and not more than 0.3137 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VI) For 2032-2033, a district assigned to band 5 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2961 and not more than 0.3314 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VII) For 2033-2034, a district assigned to band 5 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3119 and not more than 0.3490 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VIII) For 2034-2035, a district assigned to band 5 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3276 and not more than 0.3666 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (IX) For 2035-2036, a district assigned to band 5 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3434 and not more than 0.3842 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (X) For 2036-2037, a district assigned to band 5 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3591 and not more than 0.4019 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XI) For 2037-2038, a district assigned to band 5 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3749 and not more than 0.4195 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XII) For 2038-2039, a district assigned to band 5 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3906 and not more than 0.4371 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XIII) For 2039-2040, a district assigned to band 5 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.4064 and not more than 0.4547 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XIV) For 2040-2041, and every fiscal year thereafter, a district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.42 and not more than 0.47 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (F) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 85 must be assigned to band 6 and shall receive an additional weighted pupil membership at a rate of 0.2273 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. It is intended that the additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph will be increased as follows until it reaches 0.47 per economically disadvantaged pupil: (I) For 2027-2028, a district assigned to band 6 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.2432 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (II) For 2028-2029, a district assigned to band 6 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.2609 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (III) For 2029-2030, a district assigned to band 6 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.2785 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (IV) For 2030-2031, a district assigned to band 6 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.2961 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (V) For 2031-2032, a district assigned to band 6 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.3137 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VI) For 2032-2033, a district assigned to band 6 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.3314 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VII) For 2033-2034, a district assigned to band 6 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.3490 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (VIII) For 2034-2035, a district assigned to band 6 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.3666 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (IX) For 2035-2036, a district assigned to band 6 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.3842 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (X) For 2036-2037, a district assigned to band 6 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.4019 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XI) For 2037-2038, a district assigned to band 6 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.4195 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XII) For 2038-2039, a district assigned to band 6 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.4371 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XIII) For 2039-2040, a district assigned to band 6 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.4547 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (XIV) For 2040-2041, and every fiscal year thereafter, a district assigned to band 6 must receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.47 for each economically disadvantaged pupil. (G) As used in this subparagraph, "band adjustment factor" means an amount equal to the difference between the lowest and highest reimbursement bounds for each band, divided by the number of possible opportunity index scores in that band. (c) To assist the legislature in determining necessary funding levels to support foundation allowance payments for weighted pupil membership calculated in this subsection, each revenue estimating conference conducted under section 367b of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1367b, must include estimated pupil counts necessary to determine a weighted pupil membership under this subsection for the current and subsequent 2 fiscal years. Sec. 22b. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, for discretionary nonmandated payments to districts under this section, there is allocated for 2024-2025 an amount not to exceed $6,220,000,000.00 from the state school aid fund and general fund appropriations in section 11 and an amount not to exceed $41,000,000.00 from the community district education trust fund appropriation in section 11, and there is allocated for 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $6,696,500,000.00 $100.00 from the state school aid fund and general fund appropriations in section 11. In addition, there is allocated for 2025-2026 only an amount not to exceed $124,000,000.00 from the state school aid fund appropriation in section 11. For 2024-2025, the amount necessary, estimated at $77,700,000.00, must be deposited from the general fund into the state school aid fund to reimburse the state school aid fund for community district education trust fund costs in excess of $41,000,000.00, as required under section 12 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.262. For 2024-2025 only, if the amount allocated under this subsection from the community district education trust fund appropriation under section 11 is insufficient to pay for an increase under this section, any amount exceeding that allocation may be paid from other allocations under this subsection. Except for money allocated under this section from the community district education trust fund appropriation in section 11, funds Funds allocated under this section that are not expended in the fiscal year for which they were allocated, as determined by the department, may be used to supplement the allocations under sections 22a and 51c to fully fund those allocations for the same fiscal year. (2) Subject to subsection (3) (4) and section 296, the allocation to a district under this section subsection (1) is an amount equal to the sum of the amounts calculated under sections 20, 20m, 51a(2), 51a(3), 51a(11), and 51e, minus the sum of the allocations to the district under sections 22a and 51c. For a community district, the allocation as otherwise calculated under this section is increased by an amount equal to the amount of local school operating tax revenue that would otherwise be due to the community district if not for the operation of section 386 of the revised school code, MCL 380.386, to offset the absence of local school operating revenue in a community district in the funding of the state portion of the foundation allowance under section 20(4). , and, for 2024-2025 only, this increase must be paid from the community district education trust fund allocation in subsection (1). (3) In addition to the allocation under subsection (2), subject to subsection (4) and section 296, there is allocated to each district an amount equal to the target foundation allowance multiplied by the weighted pupil membership for the district. (4) (3) To receive an allocation under subsection (1) or (3), each district must do all of the following, as applicable: (a) Comply with section 1280b of the revised school code, MCL 380.1280b. (b) Comply with sections 1278a and 1278b of the revised school code, MCL 380.1278a and 380.1278b. (c) Furnish data and other information required by state and federal law to the center and the department in the form and manner specified by the center or the department, as applicable. (d) Comply with section 1230g of the revised school code, MCL 380.1230g. (e) Comply with section 21f. (f) For a district that has entered into a partnership district agreement with the department, comply with section 22p. (g) For a district receiving funds under subsection (3), comply with section 1280h of the revised school code, MCL 380.1280h. (h) Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, if a district is not using a curriculum from the department's evidence-based curriculum list required under section 1280f of the revised school code, MCL 380.1280f, provide a notification to all parents or legal guardians of students in grades K to 5 receiving instruction with that curriculum that includes all of the following: (i) A statement informing parents or legal guardians that the curriculum used by the district is not evidence-based or not aligned to state standards, which could negatively impact student academic outcomes. (ii) A statement explaining why the district is not using a curriculum that is evidence-based or aligned to state standards. (iii) A plan, including a projected timeline, for when a new curriculum will be adopted that is evidence-based and aligned to state standards. (5) (4) Districts are encouraged to use funds allocated under this section for the purchase and support of payroll, human resources, and other business function software that is compatible with that of the intermediate district in which the district is located and with other districts located within that intermediate district. (6) (5) From the allocation in subsection (1), the department shall pay up to $1,000,000.00 in litigation costs incurred by this state related to commercial or industrial property tax appeals, including, but not limited to, appeals of classification, that impact revenues dedicated to the state school aid fund. (7) (6) From the allocation in subsection (1), the department shall pay up to $1,000,000.00 in litigation costs incurred by this state associated with lawsuits filed by 1 or more districts or intermediate districts against this state. If the allocation under this section is insufficient to fully fund all payments required under this section, the payments under this subsection must be made in full before any proration of remaining payments under this section. (8) (7) It is the intent of the legislature that all constitutional obligations of this state have been fully funded under sections 22a, 31d, 51a, 51c, 51e, and 152a. If a claim is made by an entity receiving funds under this article that challenges the legislative determination of the adequacy of this funding or alleges that there exists an unfunded constitutional requirement, the state budget director may escrow or allocate from the discretionary funds for nonmandated payments under this section the amount as may be necessary to satisfy the claim before making any payments to districts under subsection (2). If funds are escrowed, the escrowed funds are a work project appropriation and the funds are carried forward into the following fiscal year. The purpose of the work project is to provide for any payments that may be awarded to districts as a result of litigation. The work project is completed upon resolution of the litigation. (9) (8) If the local claims review board or a court of competent jurisdiction makes a final determination that this state is in violation of section 29 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 regarding state payments to districts, the state budget director shall use work project funds under subsection (7) (8) or allocate from the discretionary funds for nonmandated payments under this section the amount as may be necessary to satisfy the amount owed to districts before making any payments to districts under subsection (2). (10) (9) If a claim is made in court that challenges the legislative determination of the adequacy of funding for this state's constitutional obligations or alleges that there exists an unfunded constitutional requirement, any interested party may seek an expedited review of the claim by the local claims review board. If the claim exceeds $10,000,000.00, this state may remove the action to the court of appeals, and the court of appeals has and shall exercise jurisdiction over the claim. (11) (10) If payments resulting from a final determination by the local claims review board or a court of competent jurisdiction that there has been a violation of section 29 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 exceed the amount allocated for discretionary nonmandated payments under this section, the legislature shall provide for adequate funding for this state's constitutional obligations at its next legislative session. (12) (11) If a lawsuit challenging payments made to districts related to costs reimbursed by federal title XIX Medicaid funds is filed against this state, then, for the purpose of addressing potential liability under such a lawsuit, the state budget director may place funds allocated under this section in escrow or allocate money from the funds otherwise allocated under this section, up to a maximum of 50% of the amount allocated in subsection (1). If funds are placed in escrow under this subsection, those funds are a work project appropriation and the funds are carried forward into the following fiscal year. The purpose of the work project is to provide for any payments that may be awarded to districts as a result of the litigation. The work project is completed upon resolution of the litigation. In addition, this state reserves the right to terminate future federal title XIX Medicaid reimbursement payments to districts if the amount or allocation of reimbursed funds is challenged in the lawsuit. As used in this subsection, "title XIX" means title XIX of the social security act, 42 USC 1396 to 1396w-6. (13) (12) As used in this section: (a) "Dissolved district" means that term as defined in section 20. (b) "Local school operating revenue" means school operating taxes levied under section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, local school operating revenue does not include school operating taxes levied within the geographic area of the dissolved district. (c) "Receiving district" and "school operating taxes" mean those terms as defined in section 20. Sec. 41. (1) For a district to be eligible to receive funding under this section, With funds received by a district under section 22b(3), the district must administer to English language learners the English language proficiency assessment known as the "WIDA ACCESS for English language learners" or the "WIDA Alternate ACCESS". From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $62,732,600.00 for 2025-2026 for payments to eligible districts for services for English language learners who have been administered the WIDA ACCESS for English language learners. Services for English language learners under this section may include software used to assist learning. (2) The department shall distribute funding allocated under subsection (1) to eligible districts based on the number of full-time equivalent English language learners as follows: (a) $2,329.00 per full-time equivalent English language learner who has been assessed under the WIDA ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate ACCESS with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score between 1.0 and 1.9, or less, as applicable to each assessment. It is the intent of the legislature to increase this amount until it reaches 75% of the target foundation allowance. (b) $1,608.00 per full-time equivalent English language learner who has been assessed under the WIDA ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate ACCESS with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score between 2.0 and 2.9, or less, as applicable to each assessment. It is the intent of the legislature to increase this amount until it reaches 50% of the target foundation allowance. (c) $263.00 per full-time equivalent English language learner who has been assessed under the WIDA ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate ACCESS with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score between 3.0 and 3.9, or less, as applicable to each assessment. It is the intent of the legislature to increase this amount until it reaches 35% of the target foundation allowance. (3) If funds allocated under subsection (1) are insufficient to fully fund the payments as prescribed under subsection (2), the department shall prorate payments on an equal percentage basis, with the same percentage proration applied to all funding categories. (4) By October 15 of the fiscal year following the receipt of funding under subsection (1), each district receiving funds under subsection (1) shall submit to the department a report, not to exceed 10 pages, on the usage by the district of funds under subsection (1) in a form and manner determined by the department, including a brief description of each program conducted or services performed by the district using funds under subsection (1) and the amount of funds under subsection (1) allocated to each of those programs or services. If a district does not comply with this subsection, the department shall withhold an amount equal to the December payment due under this section until the district complies with this subsection. If the district does not comply with this subsection by the end of the fiscal year, the withheld funds are forfeited to the state school aid fund. (5) To receive funds under subsection (1), a district must allow access for the department or the department's designee to audit all records related to the program for which it receives those funds. The district shall reimburse this state for all disallowances found in the audit. (6) Beginning July 1, 2020, and every 3 years thereafter, the department shall review the per-pupil distribution under subsection (2), to ensure that funding levels are appropriate and make recommendations for adjustments to the members of the senate and house subcommittees on K to 12 school aid appropriations. (2) (7) The department shall establish English language learner program models that establish a minimum number of minutes per week that districts must provide direct English language development instruction for students according to the student's proficiency levels. These models must be compliant with federal requirements related to English language learner program services. To be considered an eligible recipient of funding under this section, a A district that receives funds under section 22b(3) must agree to meet or exceed the minimum number of minutes per week, as determined by the department, that the district provides direct English language development instruction. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 903 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.